Hawaii statutes.
§334-103 Program elements. The
following shall be the program elements of the system. These shall be designed
to provide, at every level, alternatives to institutional settings. Applicants
applying to operate program elements shall show how each of these elements
works with the current programs in the community the facility will serve.
Applicants may apply for operation under the following program elements:

(1) A short-term crisis residential alternative to
hospitalization for individuals experiencing an acute episode or situational
crisis. The program shall be available for admissions twenty-four hours a day,
seven days a week. The primary focus of this element shall be on reduction of
the crisis, stabilization, diagnostic evaluation, and assessment of the
person's existing support system, including recommendations for referrals upon
discharge. This service in the program shall be designed for persons who would
otherwise be referred to an acute inpatient psychiatric unit;

(2) A long-term residential treatment program for
clients who would otherwise be living marginally in the community with little
or no service support, and who would return many times to the hospital for
treatment. It also will serve those who are referred to, and maintained in, state
facilities or nursing homes, or private or public facilities or programs under
contract with the director pursuant to section 334‑2.5, because they
require long-term, intensive support. This service shall be designed to
provide a rehabilitation program for the so-called "chronic" patient
who needs long-term support in order to develop independent living skills.
This program goes beyond maintenance to provide an active rehabilitation focus
for these individuals;

(3) A transitional residential program designed for
persons who are able to take part in programs in the general community, but
who, without the support of counseling as well as the therapeutic community,
would be at risk of returning to the hospital or becoming homeless by reason of
serious and persistent mental health challenges. These programs may employ a
variety of staffing patterns and are for persons who are expected to move
toward a more independent living setting. The clients shall be expected to
play a major role in the functioning of the household and shall be encouraged
to accept increasing levels of responsibility, both in the residential
community and in the community as a whole. Residents are required to be
involved in daytime activities outside of the facility that are relevant to
their personal goals and conducive to their achieving more self-sufficiency; or

(4) A semisupervised, independent, but structured
living arrangement for persons who do not need the intensive support of the
system elements of paragraph (1), (2), or (3), but who, without some support
and structure, are at risk of requiring hospitalization or becoming homeless by
reason of serious and persistent mental health challenges. The small
cooperative housing units shall function as independent households with direct
linkages to staff support in case of emergencies, as well as for regular
assessment and evaluation meetings. Individuals may use satellite housing as a
transition to independent living or may remain in this setting indefinitely in
order to avoid the need for more intensive settings. This element is for
persons who only need minimum professional or paraprofessional support in order
to live in the community. These units should be as normative as the general
living arrangements in the communities in which they are developed. [L 1980, c
221, pt of §2; am L 1985, c 219, §1; am L 1986, c 237, §2; am L 1997, c 220,
§3; am L 1999, c 119, §7; am L 2016, c 186, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next